District of Columbia statutes.
44-2110

Repealed

Custody and investment.

Repealed.

Nov. 7, 1941, 55 Stat. 760, ch. 469, § 2
Nov. 8, 1984, 98 Stat. 3369, Pub. L. 98-621, § 10(j)
1981 Ed., § 32-610.
1973 Ed., § 32-409.
Section 11(b) of Pub. L. 98-621 makes § 10 of that act effective on October 1, 1987.